Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 5. Supervised Administration.

Sec. 13.16.215.
Supervised administration; nature of proceeding.

Supervised administration is a single in rem proceeding to secure complete administration and settlement of a decedent’s estate under the continuing authority of the court which extends until entry of an order approving distribution of the estate and discharging the personal representative or other order terminating the proceeding.
A supervised personal representative is responsible to the court, as well as to the interested parties, and is subject to directions concerning the estate made by the court on its own motion or on the motion of any interested party. Except as otherwise provided in AS

13.16.215

—

13.16.235

, or as otherwise ordered by the court, a supervised personal representative has the same duties and powers as a personal representative who is not supervised.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.220.
Supervised administration; petition; order.

A petition for supervised administration may be filed by any interested person or by a personal representative at any time or the prayer for supervised administration may be joined with a petition in a testacy or appointment proceeding.
If the testacy of the decedent and the priority and qualification of any personal representative have not been adjudicated previously, the petition for supervised administration must include the matters required of a petition in a formal testacy proceeding and the notice requirements and procedures applicable to a formal testacy proceeding apply.
If not previously adjudicated, the court shall adjudicate the testacy of the decedent and questions relating to the priority and qualifications of the personal representative in any case involving a request for supervised administration, even though the request for supervised administration may be denied. After notice to interested persons, the court shall order supervised administration of a decedent’s estate as follows:

if the decedent’s will directs supervised administration, it shall be ordered unless the court finds that circumstances bearing on the need for supervised administration have changed since the execution of the will and that there is no necessity for supervised administration;

if the decedent’s will directs unsupervised administration, supervised administration shall be ordered only upon a finding that it is necessary for protection of persons interested in the estate; or

in other cases if the court finds that supervised administration is necessary under the circumstances.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.225.
Supervised administration; effect on other proceedings.

The pendency of a proceeding for supervised administration of a decedent’s estate stays action on any informal application then pending or thereafter filed.

If a will has been previously probated in informal proceedings, the effect of the filing of a petition for supervised administration is as provided for formal testacy proceedings by AS

13.16.140

.

After receiving notice of the filing of a petition for supervised administration, a personal representative who has been appointed previously may not exercise the power to distribute any estate. The filing of the petition does not affect other powers and duties unless the court restricts the exercise of any of them pending full hearing on the petition.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.230.
Supervised administration; powers of personal representative.

Unless restricted by the court, a supervised personal representative has, without interim orders approving exercise of a power, all powers of personal representatives under AS 13.06
—
AS 13.36, but a supervised personal representative may not exercise the power to make any distribution of the estate without prior order of the court.
Any other restriction on the power of a personal representative that may be ordered by the court must be endorsed on the letters of appointment and, unless so endorsed, is ineffective as to persons dealing in good faith with the personal representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.16.235.
Supervised administration; interim orders; distribution and closing orders.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, supervised administration is terminated by order in accordance with time restrictions, notices, and contents of orders prescribed for proceedings under AS

13.16.620

.
Interim orders approving or directing partial distributions or granting other relief may be issued by the court at any time during the pendency of a supervised administration on the application of the personal representative or any interested person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)